en: beta-galactosidase
bg: бета-галактозидаза
ca: Beta-galatosidasa
de: Βeta-Galactosidase
es: Beta galactosidasa
et: Β-galaktosidaas
fi: beetagalaktosidaasi, ß-galaktosidaasi
fr: Bêta-galactosidase, Bêta-D-galactosidase
hr: beta-galaktozidaza
hu: béta-galaktozidáz, β-galaktozidáz
id: Β-galaktosidase
it: Beta-galattosidasi
ja: Β-ガラクトシダーゼ
nn: β-galaktosidase
sh: Beta-galaktozidaza
sr: Beta-galaktozidaza
uk: Бета-галактозидаза
zh: Β-半乳糖苷酶

en: E1104
hr: e1104
it: E1104, Lipasi

en: transglutaminase
ar: ترانسغلوتاميناز
bg: трансглутаминаза, трансглутаминоза
ca: transglutaminasa
de: Transglutaminase
es: Transglutaminasa
fa: ترانس گلوتامیناز
fi: transglutaminaasi
fr: transglutaminase
he: טרנסגלוטמינאז
hr: transglutaminaza
hu: transzglutamináz
id: Transglutaminase
it: Transglutaminasi
ja: トランスグルタミナーゼ
nb: transglutaminase
nl: transglutaminase
nn: transglutaminase
pt: transglutaminase
ru: Трансглютаминаза
sh: Transglutaminaza
sr: трансглутаминаза

en: xylanase
bg: ксиланаза
bs: Ksilanaza
ca: xilanasa
da: xylanase
de: Xylanasen
es: xilanasa
fi: Ksylanaasi
fr: xylanase
hr: ksilanaza
hu: xilanáz
id: Xylanase
it: Xilanasi
ja: キシラナーゼ
nl: xylanase
nn: xylanase
pt: xilanase
sh: Ksilanaza
sr: Ksilanaza
sv: Xylanas
zh: 木聚糖酶

en: dairy, dairy product, dairy products, dairy food, dairy foods, milk product, milk products, milk based product
af: Suiwelproduk
ar: منتجات الألبان
be: Малочныя прадукты
br: Boued-laezh
bs: Mliječni proizvodi
ca: Làctic, producte làctic, llet i els seus derivats, llet i derivats, derivats làctics, làctics, productes làctics, producte a base de llet, productes a base de llet
cs: Mléčný výrobek
cy: Cynnyrch llaeth
da: Mejeriprodukter
de: Milcherzeugnisse, Milchprodukte, Molkereiprodukte, Milcherzeugnis, Milchprodukt, Molkereiprodukt
el: Γαλακτοκομικά προϊόντα
eo: Laktoprodukto
es: productos lácteos, leche y sus derivados, leche y derivados, derivados lácteos, lácteos, lácteo, producto lácteo, producto a base de leche, productos a base de leche
et: Piimatoode
eu: Esneki
fa: فراورده لبنی
fi: maitotuote, maitotuotteet, maitovalmiste, maitovalmisteet
fr: produits laitiers et dérivées, laits et dérivés y compris lactose, dérivés laitiers, produits laitiers, produit laitier, produits laitiers et dérivés, lactique, lactiques, laitage
fy: Suvel
gl: Produtos lácteos
he: מוצרי חלב
hi: दुग्ध-उत्पाद
hr: mliječni proizvodi
hu: tejtermék, tejtermékek
hy: Կաթնամթերք
id: Produk susu
is: Mjólkurafurð
it: Latticini, derivati del latte, latte e derivati, prodotti a base di latte, a base di latte
ja: 乳製品
kk: Сүт тағамдары
kn: ಕ್ಷೀರೋತ್ಪನ್ನ
ko: 유제품
lt: Pieno produktas
lv: Piena produkti
mn: Сүүн бүтээгдэхүүн
ms: Produk tenusu
nb: meieriprodukter
nl: Zuivel
no: meieri produkt, meieriprodukter
oc: Produch lachièr
pl: Przetwory mleczne
pt: Lacticínios
ro: Produse lactate
ru: Молочные продукты
si: ගව කිරි ආශ්‍රිත නිෂ්පාදන
sl: Mlečni izdelek
sr: Млечни производи
sv: Mejeriprodukt, mjölkprodukt
ta: பால் பொருள்
th: ผลิตภัณฑ์นม
tr: Mandıra ürünü
uk: Молочні продукти
uz: Sut mahsulotlari
yi: מילכיגס
zh: 奶制品

en: fermented milk products, cultured dairy foods, cultured dairy products, cultured milk products
be: Кісламалочныя прадукты
bg: ферментирали млечни продукти
ca: Llet fermentada, productes làctics fermentats
cs: Kysaný mléčný výrobek
de: Sauermilchprodukte, Sauermilchprodukt, Sauermilcherzeugnis, Sauermilcherzeugnisse
es: Producto fermentado de la leche
fi: hapanmaitotuote, hapanmaitotuotteet
fr: produits laitiers fermentés, produits laitiers de culture, produits issus de lait de culture
hr: fermentirani mliječni proizvodi
hu: fermentált tejtermékek, savanyított tejtermékek, tejkultúrák
hy: Կաթնաթթվային մթերք
it: latticini fermentati
ko: 발효유
lv: Skābpiena produkti
ru: Кисломолочные продукты
uk: Кисломолочний продукт

en: First age baby milk powder, First milk powder, First infant milk formula in powder
fr: Lait 1er âge en poudre soluble, Lait premier âge en poudre soluble, Préparation pour nourrissons en poudre soluble

en: Second age baby milk powder, Second milk powder, Second infant milk formula in powder
fr: Lait 2ème âge en poudre soluble, Lait deuxième âge en poudre soluble, Préparation de suite en poudre soluble

en: butter
am: ቅቤ
an: manteca
ar: زبدة
az: kərə yağı
ba: aҡ май
be: cметанковае масла
bg: краве масло, масло
bn: মাখন
br: amanenn
bs: maslac
ca: mantega
cs: máslo
cv: Çу
cy: menyn
da: smør
de: Butter, Butterfett
el: βούτυρο
eo: butero
es: mantequilla, grasa láctica
et: või
eu: gurin
fa: کره
fi: voi, voita
fo: smør
fr: beurre
fy: bûter
ga: im
gl: manteiga
gu: માખણ
he: חמאה
hi: मक्खन
hr: maslac
ht: bè
hu: vaj
hy: Կարագ
id: mentega
io: butro
is: smjör
it: burro
ja: バター
jv: mertéga
ka: კარაქი
kn: ಬೆಣ್ಣೆ
ko: 버터
ku: nivîşk
la: butyrum
lb: botter
li: bótter
lo: ເນີຍ
lt: sviestas
lv: sviests
mk: Путер
ml: വെണ്ണ
mr: लोणी
ms: mentega
my: ထောပတ်
nb: smør
ne: नौनी
nl: boter, roomboter
nn: smør
oc: burre
os: hæлхæ
pa: ਮੱਖਣ
pl: masło, masła, maślany, maślane, maślana
pt: manteiga
qu: mantikilla
ro: unt
ru: cли́вочное ма́сло, сливочное масло, масло сливочное
sa: नवनीतम्
sc: butiru
sd: مکڻ
sh: maslac
si: බටර්
sk: maslo
sl: maslo
so: subag
sq: gjalpa
sr: mаслац, maslac
su: mentéga
sv: smör
sw: siagi
ta: வெண்ணெய்
te: వెన్న
tg: Равғани зард
th: เนย
tl: mantekilya, mantikilya
tr: tereyağı
tt: atlan may, aq may
uk: mасло вершкове
ur: مکھن
uz: sariyogʻ
vi: bơ
vo: bör
wa: boure
yi: פוטער
zh: 黄油, 黃油

en: unsalted butter
ca: mantega sense sal
de: ungesalzene Butter
es: Mantequilla sin sal
fi: suolaamaton voi, suolaton voi
fr: beurre doux
hr: neslani maslac
hu: sózatlan vaj, sótlan vaj
it: Burro non salato, Burro non-salato
nl: ongezouten boter
pt: Manteiga sem sal

en: 82% fat unsalted butter
fr: Beurre à 82% MG doux
hr: neslani maslac 82% masti
it: Burro non salato 82% di grassi, burro dolce 82% di grassi

en: 82% fat unsalted easy-to-spread butter
it: Burro morbido non salato 82% di grassi, burro morbido dolce 82% di grassi

en: lightly salted butter
fi: vähäsuolainen voi
fr: beurre demi-sel
hr: lagano posoljeni maslac
hu: félig sózott vaj, félsós vaj
it: burro leggermente salato
nl: halfgezouten boter

en: Lightly salted 80% fat butter
fr: Beurre à 80% MG demi-sel
hr: blago posoljeni maslac 80% masnoće
it: burro leggermente salato 80% di grassi

en: salted butter
ca: mantega salada, mantega amb sal
da: saltet smør
de: gesalzene Butter, gesalzenes Butter
es: mantequilla salada, Mantequilla con sal, mantequilla con sal marina
fi: suolattu voi, voimakassuolainen voi
fr: beurre salé
hr: posoljeni maslac
hu: sózott vaj, sós vaj
it: Burro salato
ja: 塩バター
nl: gezouten boter
pt: manteiga com sal

en: 80% fat salted butter
fr: Beurre à 80% MG salé
hr: slani maslac 80% masti
it: burro salato 80% di grassi

en: churned butter
ca: mantega batuda
de: geschlagene Butter
es: manteca batida
fi: kirnuttu voi, kirnuvoi
fr: beurre de baratte
hr: umućeni maslac
hu: köpült vaj
it: burro sbattuto
nl: gekarnde boter

fr: beurre de baratte demi-sel
ca: mantega de barrejar mitja sal
de: gesalzene Buttermischung
es: mantequilla de baratte semi-salada
fi: puolisuolainen kirnuvoi
hu: félig sózott kevert vaj
it: burro di baratte semi-salato
nl: halfgezouten gekarnde boter
pt: manteiga de baratte meio salgada

en: unsalted churned butter
fr: beurre doux de baratte, beurre de baratte doux
it: burro sbattuto dolce, burro dolce sbattuto

en: pasteurized butter, pasteurised butter
ca: mantega pasteuritzada
de: pasteurisierter Butter
es: mantequilla pasteurizada
fi: pastöroitu voi
fr: beurre pasteurisé
hr: pasterizirani maslac
hu: pasztőrözött vaj, pasztörizált vaj, hőkezelt vaj
it: burro pastorizzato
nl: gepasteuriseerde boter